Arkansas, session 2025, SB25.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. REGULAR SALARIES - OPERATIONS. There is hereby established
for the Department of Commerce - State Insurance Department for the 2025-2026
fiscal year, the following maximum number of regular employees.

Maximum Annual
Maximum Salary Rate
Item Class No. of Fiscal Year
No. Code Title Employees 2025-2026
(1) U047U ACOM STATE INSURANCE COMMISSIONER 1 GRADE SE03
(2) U042U ACOM INSURANCE CHIEF DEPUTY COMM 1 GRADE SE02
(3) N025N ACOM INSURANCE DEP COMM INFO SVCS 1 GRADE SE01
(4) D028N REGULATORY HEALTH LINK TECH OFFICER 1 GRADE IT10
(5) D010N ACOM INSURANCE CHIEF TECHNOLOGY OFF 1 GRADE IT08
(6) D007C INFORMATION SYSTEMS MANAGER 1 GRADE IT08
*MAH015*
04-03-2025 14:39:57 MAH015

As Engrossed: S4/3/25 SB25
(7) D038C SENIOR SOFTWARE SUPPORT ANALYST 1 GRADE IT06
(8) D022C SYSTEMS SPECIALIST 4 GRADE IT06
(9) D052C SOFTWARE SUPPORT ANALYST 3 GRADE IT05
(10) D044C SYSTEMS ANALYST 1 GRADE IT05
(11) N014N ACOM INSURANCE DEP COMM FINANCE REGS 1 GRADE GS15
(12) N201N DEPUTY COMM OF CRIM INVESTIGATIONS 1 GRADE GS15
(13) G018N ACOM DIRECTOR RISK MANAGEMENT 1 GRADE GS14
(14) N140N ACOM INS ASST DEP COMMISSIONER FINANCE 3 GRADE GS14
(15) A128C ACOM INSURANCE CLAIMS DIR PUBLIC EMP 1 GRADE GS14
(16) N190N ACOM INSURANCE GENERAL COUNSEL 1 GRADE GS14
(17) X002N PROPERTY & CASUALTY MANAGER 1 GRADE GS14
(18) A004N CERTIFIED FINANCIAL EXAMINER MANAGER 3 GRADE GS13
(19) G019C GENERAL COUNSEL 1 GRADE GS13
(20) G004C MANAGING ATTORNEY 3 GRADE GS13
(21) G043N RISK MANAGEMENT ASSISTANT DIRECTOR 1 GRADE GS13
(22) G010C ACOM DIVISION MANAGER 1 GRADE GS12
(23) G025C ATTORNEY SUPERVISOR 1 GRADE GS12
(24) A004C CERTIFIED FINANCIAL EXAMINER 11 GRADE GS12
(25) A014C FISCAL DIVISION MANAGER 1 GRADE GS12
(26) R013C AGENCY HUMAN RESOURCES MANAGER 1 GRADE GS11
(27) G047C ATTORNEY SPECIALIST 7 GRADE GS11
(28) A007C AUDIT MANAGER 1 GRADE GS11
(29) P074C ACOM AID PUBLIC INFORMATION OFFICER 1 GRADE GS10
(30) X009C ACOM INS DEPT DIR OF SECURITY OPS 1 GRADE GS10
(31) G259C ACOM INSURANCE PROGRAM MANAGER 4 GRADE GS10
(32) G076C ADMINISTRATIVE SERVICES MANAGER 1 GRADE GS10
(33) A044C AUDIT COORDINATOR 1 GRADE GS10
(34) X032C ACOM SENIOR SECURITIES EXAMINER 1 GRADE GS09
(35) G241C HEALTH INFO TECH OPER & TECH OFFICER 1 GRADE GS09
(36) A042C INSURANCE SENIOR EXAMINER 6 GRADE GS09
(37) X020C ACOM BURIAL ASSOCIATION BD EXEC SEC 1 GRADE GS08
(38) X018C ACOM INSURANCE CONSUMER PROTECT MGR 1 GRADE GS08
(39) X017C ACOM INSURANCE LICENSING MANAGER 1 GRADE GS08
(40) G304C ACOM WORKERS' COMPENSATION PROG MGR 1 GRADE GS08
(41) X192C ASST DIRECTOR FRAUD INVESTIGATION 1 GRADE GS08
(42) X072C CRIMINAL INS FRAUD INVESTIGATOR 7 GRADE GS08
04-03-2025 14:39:57 MAH015

As Engrossed: S4/3/25 SB25
(43) R014C PERSONNEL MANAGER 1 GRADE GS08
(44) A041C PROGRAM FISCAL MANAGER 1 GRADE GS08
(45) A060C SENIOR AUDITOR 2 GRADE GS08
(46) G064C SR HLTH INSURANCE INFORMATION PRG MGR 2 GRADE GS08
(47) G106C WCC CLAIMS SPECIALIST 5 GRADE GS08
(48) A067C ACOM INSURANCE EXAMINER 2 GRADE GS07
(49) X083C ACOM INS LIFE & HEALTH COMP OFFICER 4 GRADE GS07
(50) X066C ACOM INSURANCE PREMIUM TAX EXAMINER 4 GRADE GS07
(51) A081C AUDITOR 1 GRADE GS07
(52) X080C PROPERTY & CASUALTY COMPLIANCE OFFICER 3 GRADE GS07
(53) G120C RISK CONSULTANT 10 GRADE GS07
(54) C037C ADMINISTRATIVE ANALYST 7 GRADE GS06
(55) X088C EMBALMERS & FUNERAL DIR INVESTIGATOR 2 GRADE GS06
(56) R025C HUMAN RESOURCES ANALYST 1 GRADE GS06
(57) R029C HUMAN RESOURCES RECRUITER 1 GRADE GS06
(58) G179C LEGAL SERVICES SPECIALIST 2 GRADE GS06
(59) M066C PROGRAM ELIGIBILITY SPECIALIST 3 GRADE GS06
(60) G202C VOLUNTEER PROGRAM COORDINATOR 3 GRADE GS06
(61) C016C ACOM INSURANCE ADMINISTRATIVE COORD 3 GRADE GS05
(62) R033C BENEFITS ANALYST 1 GRADE GS05
(63) X123C INSURANCE INVESTIGATOR 9 GRADE GS05
(64) G201C WCC CLAIMS ANALYST 3 GRADE GS05
(65) C056C ADMINISTRATIVE SPECIALIST III 13 GRADE GS04
(66) A098C FISCAL SUPPORT SPECIALIST 4 GRADE GS04
(67) RO36C HUMAN RESOURCES SPECIALIST 1 GRADE GS04
(68) C046C LEGAL SUPPORT SPECIALIST 3 GRADE GS04
(69) X180C ACOM INSURANCE LICENSING TECHNICIAN 7 GRADE GS03
(70) C073C ADMINISTRATIVE SPECIALIST II 10 GRADE GS03
(71) C087C ADMINISTRATIVE SPECIALIST I 1 GRADE GS02
(72) C084C MAIL SERVICES SPECIALIST 1 GRADE GS02
MAX. NO. OF EMPLOYEES 188

SECTION 2. EXTRA HELP. There is hereby authorized, for the Department
of Commerce - State Insurance Department for the 2025-2026 fiscal year, the
following maximum number of part-time or temporary employees, to be known as
"Extra Help", payable from funds appropriated herein for such purposes:
04-03-2025 14:39:57 MAH015

As Engrossed: S4/3/25 SB25
nineteen (19) temporary or part-time employees, when needed, at rates of pay
not to exceed those provided in the Uniform Classification and Compensation
Act, or its successor, or this act for the appropriate classification.

SECTION 3. APPROPRIATION - OPERATIONS. There is hereby appropriated,
to the Department of Commerce, to be payable from the State Insurance
Department Trust Fund, for personal services, operating expenses, special
maintenance and professional services of the Department of Commerce - State
Insurance Department - Operations for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026,
the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) REGULAR SALARIES $8,183,021
(02) EXTRA HELP 140,000
(03) PERSONAL SERVICES MATCHING 2,870,046
(04) OVERTIME 27,500
(05) MAINT. & GEN. OPERATION
(A) OPER. EXPENSE 2,250,674
(B) CONF. & TRAVEL 188,000
(C) PROF. FEES 161,600
(D) CAP. OUTLAY 150,000
(E) DATA PROC. 0
(06) PROFESSIONAL SERVICES 956,000
(07) AHIM EXPENSES 500,000
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $15,426,841

SECTION 4. APPROPRIATION - FUNERAL SERVICES. There is hereby
appropriated, to the Department of Commerce, to be payable from the cash fund
deposited in the State Treasury as determined by the Chief Fiscal Officer of
the State, for personal services and operating expenses of the Department of
Commerce - State Insurance Department - Funeral Services for the fiscal year
ending June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
04-03-2025 14:39:57 MAH015

As Engrossed: S4/3/25 SB25
(01) REGULAR SALARIES $326,284
(02) PERSONAL SERVICES MATCHING 122,466
(03) MAINT. & GEN. OPERATION
(A) OPER. EXPENSE 100,000
(B) CONF. & TRAVEL 5,464
(C) PROF. FEES 2,950
(D) CAP. OUTLAY 0
(E) DATA PROC. 0
(04) LOANS 55,000
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $612,164

SECTION 5. APPROPRIATION - INSURANCE FRAUD INVESTIGATION DIVISION.
There is hereby appropriated, to the Department of Commerce, to be payable
from the State Insurance Department Criminal Investigation Division Trust
Fund, for personal services and operating expenses of the Department of
Commerce - State Insurance Department - Insurance Fraud Investigation
Division for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) REGULAR SALARIES $987,058
(02) PERSONAL SERVICES MATCHING 334,870
(03) MAINT. & GEN. OPERATION
(A) OPER. EXPENSE 220,635
(B) CONF. & TRAVEL 35,000
(C) PROF. FEES 4,000
(D) CAP. OUTLAY 60,000
(E) DATA PROC. 0
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $1,641,563

SECTION 6. APPROPRIATION - PREPAID FUNERAL BENEFITS DIVISION. There is
hereby appropriated, to the Department of Commerce, to be payable from the
State Insurance Department Prepaid Trust Fund, for personal services and
operating expenses of the Department of Commerce - State Insurance Department
- Prepaid Funeral Benefits Division for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026,
the following:
04-03-2025 14:39:57 MAH015

As Engrossed: S4/3/25 SB25

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) REGULAR SALARIES $290,009
(02) PERSONAL SERVICES MATCHING 106,215
(03) MAINT. & GEN. OPERATION
(A) OPER. EXPENSE 36,700
(B) CONF. & TRAVEL 4,000
(C) PROF. FEES 0
(D) CAP. OUTLAY 30,000
(E) DATA PROC. 0
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $466,924

SECTION 7. APPROPRIATION - PREPAID FUNERAL CONTRACTS RECOVERY
PROGRAM. There is hereby appropriated, to the Department of Commerce, to be
payable from the State Insurance Department Prepaid Trust Fund, for expenses
and payment of claims of the Department of Commerce - State Insurance
Department Prepaid Contracts Recovery Program for the fiscal year ending June
30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) EXPENSES AND CLAIMS FOR PREPAID
FUNERAL CONTRACTS RECOVERY PROGRAM $500,000

SECTION 8. APPROPRIATION - REFUNDS OF OVERPAYMENTS. There is hereby
appropriated, to the Department of Commerce, to be payable from the
Miscellaneous Revolving Fund, for payments of miscellaneous tax and fee
refunds by the Department of Commerce - State Insurance Department - Refunds
of Overpayments for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) REFUNDS/REIMBURSEMENTS $11,000,000

SECTION 9. APPROPRIATION - CONTINUING EDUCATION PROGRAM. There is
04-03-2025 14:39:57 MAH015

As Engrossed: S4/3/25 SB25
hereby appropriated, to the Department of Commerce, to be payable from the
Insurance Continuing Education Trust Fund, for personal services of the
Department of Commerce - State Insurance Department - Continuing Education
Program for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) REGULAR SALARIES $25,268
(02) PERSONAL SERVICES MATCHING 5,916
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $31,184

SECTION 10. APPROPRIATION - HEALTH INFORMATION COUNSELING. There is
hereby appropriated, to the Department of Commerce, to be payable from the
federal funds as designated by the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State, for
personal services and operating expenses of the Department of Commerce -
State Insurance Department - Health Information Counseling for the fiscal
year ending June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) REGULAR SALARIES $318,851
(02) PERSONAL SERVICES MATCHING 137,135
(03) MAINT. & GEN. OPERATION
(A) OPER. EXPENSE 317,407
(B) CONF. & TRAVEL 20,000
(C) PROF. FEES 471,552
(D) CAP. OUTLAY 0
(E) DATA PROC. 0
(04) PROMOTIONAL ITEMS 55,000
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $1,319,945

SECTION 11. APPROPRIATION - CONSUMER INFORMATION SYSTEM - CASH. There
is hereby appropriated, to the Department of Commerce, to be payable from the
cash fund deposited in the State Treasury as determined by the Chief Fiscal
Officer of the State, for operating expenses of the Department of Commerce -
State Insurance Department - Consumer Information System - Cash for the
04-03-2025 14:39:57 MAH015

As Engrossed: S4/3/25 SB25
fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) MAINT. & GEN. OPERATION
(A) OPER. EXPENSE $28,005
(B) CONF. & TRAVEL 0
(C) PROF. FEES 0
(D) CAP. OUTLAY 0
(E) DATA PROC. 0
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $28,005

SECTION 12. APPROPRIATION - PUBLIC EMPLOYEE CLAIMS SECTION. There is
hereby appropriated, to the Department of Commerce, to be payable from the
Miscellaneous Agencies Fund Account, for personal services and operating
expenses of the Department of Commerce - State Insurance Department - Public
Employee Claims Section for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the
following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) REGULAR SALARIES $1,185,851
(02) PERSONAL SERVICES MATCHING 438,710
(03) MAINT. & GEN. OPERATION
(A) OPER. EXPENSE 498,631
(B) CONF. & TRAVEL 24,300
(C) PROF. FEES 0
(D) CAP. OUTLAY 0
(E) DATA PROC. 0
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $2,147,492

SECTION 13. APPROPRIATION - STATE EMPLOYEE CLAIMS. There is hereby
appropriated, to the Department of Commerce, to be payable from the Workers'
Compensation Revolving Fund, for payment of state employee claims by the
Department of Commerce - State Insurance Department - State Employee Claims
for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the following:
04-03-2025 14:39:57 MAH015

As Engrossed: S4/3/25 SB25

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) STATE EMPLOYEE CLAIMS $15,500,000

SECTION 14. APPROPRIATION - PUBLIC SCHOOL EMPLOYEE CLAIMS. There is
hereby appropriated, to the Department of Commerce, to be payable from the
Miscellaneous Revolving Fund, for payment of public school employee claims by
the Department of Commerce - State Insurance Department - Public School
Employee Claims for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) PUBLIC SCHOOL EMPLOYEE CLAIMS $400,000

SECTION 15. APPROPRIATION - COUNTY EMPLOYEE CLAIMS. There is hereby
appropriated, to the Department of Commerce, to be payable from the
Miscellaneous Revolving Fund, for payment of county employee claims by the
Department of Commerce - State Insurance Department - County Employee Claims
for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) COUNTY EMPLOYEE CLAIMS $200,000

SECTION 16. APPROPRIATION - CITY EMPLOYEE CLAIMS. There is hereby
appropriated, to the Department of Commerce, to be payable from the
Miscellaneous Revolving Fund, for payment of city employee claims by the
Department of Commerce - State Insurance Department - City Employee Claims
for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) CITY EMPLOYEE CLAIMS $400,000

SECTION 17. APPROPRIATION - GOVERNMENTAL BONDING BOARD. There is
04-03-2025 14:39:57 MAH015

As Engrossed: S4/3/25 SB25
hereby appropriated, to the Department of Commerce, to be payable from the
Self-Insured Fidelity Bond Trust Fund, for operating expenses, refunds,
reimbursements, claims, and professional services of the Department of
Commerce - State Insurance Department - Governmental Bonding Board for the
fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) MAINT. & GEN. OPERATION
(A) OPER. EXPENSE $5,000
(B) CONF. & TRAVEL 0
(C) PROF. FEES 0
(D) CAP. OUTLAY 0
(E) DATA PROC. 0
(02) REFUNDS/REIMBURSEMENTS 150,000
(03) CLAIMS 1,500,000
(04) PROFESSIONAL SERVICES 50,000
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $1,705,000

SECTION 18. APPROPRIATION - ARKANSAS MULTI-AGENCY INSURANCE TRUST FUND.
There is hereby appropriated, to the Department of Commerce, to be payable
from the Arkansas Multi-Agency Insurance Trust Fund, for expense and payment
of claims by the Department of Commerce - State Insurance Department -
Arkansas Multi-Agency Insurance Trust Fund for the fiscal year ending June
30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) FOR EXPENSES AND CLAIMS FROM AMAIT FUND $75,000,000

SECTION 19. APPROPRIATION - PUBLIC SCHOOL INSURANCE PROGRAM. There is
hereby appropriated, to the Department of Commerce, to be payable from the
Public School Insurance Trust Fund, for expenses and payment of claims by the
Department of Commerce - State Insurance Department - Public School Insurance
Program for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the following:

04-03-2025 14:39:57 MAH015

As Engrossed: S4/3/25 SB25
ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) EXPENSES AND CLAIMS $50,000,000

SECTION 20. APPROPRIATION - CRIMINAL BACKGROUND CHECKS - CASH. There
is hereby appropriated, to the Department of Commerce, to be payable from the
cash fund deposited in the State Treasury as determined by the Chief Fiscal
Officer of the State, for operating expenses of the Department of Commerce -
State Insurance Department - Criminal Background Checks - Cash for the fiscal
year ending June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) MAINT. & GEN. OPERATION
(A) OPER. EXPENSE $25,000
(B) CONF. & TRAVEL 0
(C) PROF. FEES 0
(D) CAP. OUTLAY 0
(E) DATA PROC. 0
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $25,000

SECTION 21. APPROPRIATION - ARKANSAS HEALTHCARE TRANSPARENCY INITIATIVE
DATABASE. There is hereby appropriated, to the Department of Commerce, to be
payable from the Arkansas Healthcare Transparency Initiative Fund, for the
Arkansas Healthcare Transparency Initiative Database, maintenance and
operations, data collection and management, and data request fulfillment of
the Department of Commerce - State Insurance Department for the fiscal year
ending June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) HEALTHCARE TRANSPARENCY INITIATIVE
DATABASE EXPENSES $3,200,000

SECTION 22. APPROPRIATION - FIREFIGHTER CANCER RELIEF. There is hereby
appropriated, to the Department of Commerce - State Insurance Department, to
04-03-2025 14:39:57 MAH015

As Engrossed: S4/3/25 SB25
be payable from the Arkansas Firefighter Cancer Relief Network Trust Fund,
for relief to firefighters who are diagnosed with cancer and participating in
a firefighter cancer relief network for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026,
the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) FIREFIGHTER CANCER RELIEF $250,000

SECTION 23. APPROPRIATION - MEDICARE IMPROVEMENTS FOR PATIENTS AND
PROVIDERS ACT. There is hereby appropriated, to the Department of Commerce,
to be payable from the federal funds as designated by the Chief Fiscal
Officer of the State, for personal services and operating expenses of the
Department of Commerce - State Insurance Department - MIPPA for the fiscal
year ending June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) REGULAR SALARIES $235,183
(02) PERSONAL SERVICES MATCHING 90,005
(03) MAINT. & GEN. OPERATION
(A) OPER. EXPENSE 266,229
(B) CONF. & TRAVEL 47,630
(C) PROF. FEES 541,802
(D) CAP. OUTLAY 0
(E) DATA PROC. 0
(04) PROMOTIONAL ITEMS 105,291
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $1,286,140

SECTION 24. APPROPRIATION - ARKANSAS SELF-FUNDED CYBER RESPONSE
PROGRAM. There is hereby appropriated, to the Department of Commerce, to be
payable from the Arkansas Self-Funded Cyber Response Program Trust Fund, for
expenses of the Arkansas Self-Funded Cyber Response program by the Department
of Commerce - State Insurance Department - Arkansas Cyber Response Board for
the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the following:

04-03-2025 14:39:57 MAH015

As Engrossed: S4/3/25 SB25
ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) EXPENSES OF THE AR CYBER RESPONSE
PROGRAM $10,000,000

SECTION 25. APPROPRIATION - SENIOR MEDICARE PATROL SMP. There is
hereby appropriated, to the Department of Commerce, to be payable from the
federal funds as designated by the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State, to
empower and assist Medicare beneficiaries to prevent, detect, and report
health care fraud, errors, and abuse through outreach, counseling and
education by the Department of Commerce - State Insurance Department for the
fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) REGULAR SALARIES $130,177
(02) PERSONAL SERVICES MATCHING 53,662
(03) MAINT. & GEN. OPERATION
(A) OPER. EXPENSE 394,432
(B) CONF. & TRAVEL 9,582
(C) PROF. FEES 0
(D) CAP. OUTLAY 0
(04) GRANTS AND AID 192,000
(05) PROMOTIONAL ITEMS 36,000
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $815,853

SECTION 26. SPECIAL LANGUAGE. NOT TO BE INCORPORATED INTO THE ARKANSAS
CODE NOR PUBLISHED SEPARATELY AS SPECIAL, LOCAL AND TEMPORARY LAW. TRANSFER
PROVISION. In the event the State Insurance Department is unable to maintain
a full roster of examination personnel, and upon approval of the Chief Fiscal
Officer of the State, the resulting unused appropriations in Regular
Salaries, Extra Help, and Personal Services Matching may be transferred to
the Professional Services special line item for the purpose of contracting
with qualified individuals or firms for examination assistance.
The provisions of this section shall be in effect only from July 1, 2024
2025 through June 30, 2025 2026.
04-03-2025 14:39:57 MAH015

As Engrossed: S4/3/25 SB25

SECTION 27. SPECIAL LANGUAGE. NOT TO BE INCORPORATED INTO THE ARKANSAS
CODE NOR PUBLISHED SEPARATELY AS SPECIAL, LOCAL AND TEMPORARY LAW. REFUND TO
EXPENDITURE. The proceeds from the reimbursement of travel expenses received
by the Arkansas Insurance Department, shall be deposited into the same State
Treasury Fund or Fund Account from which the original travel expenditure was
incurred as a refund to expenditure to the credit of the appropriation from
which the original expenditure was made.
The provisions of this section shall be in effect only from July, 1,
2024 2025 through June 30, 2025 2026.

SECTION 28. COMPLIANCE WITH OTHER LAWS. Disbursement of funds
authorized by this act shall be limited to the appropriation for such agency
and funds made available by law for the support of such appropriations; and
the restrictions of the State Procurement Law, the General Accounting and
Budgetary Procedures Law, the Revenue Stabilization Law, the Regular Salary
Procedures and Restrictions Act, or their successors, and other fiscal
control laws of this State, where applicable, and regulations promulgated by
the Department of Finance and Administration, as authorized by law, shall be
strictly complied with in disbursement of said funds.

SECTION 29. LEGISLATIVE INTENT. It is the intent of the General
Assembly that any funds disbursed under the authority of the appropriations
contained in this act shall be in compliance with the stated reasons for
which this act was adopted, as evidenced by the Agency Requests, Executive
Recommendations and Legislative Recommendations contained in the budget
manuals prepared by the Department of Finance and Administration, letters, or
summarized oral testimony in the official minutes of the Arkansas Legislative
Council or Joint Budget Committee which relate to its passage and adoption.

SECTION 30. EMERGENCY CLAUSE. It is found and determined by the
General Assembly, that the Constitution of the State of Arkansas prohibits
the appropriation of funds for more than a one (1) year period; that the
effectiveness of this Act on July 1, 2025 is essential to the operation of
the agency for which the appropriations in this Act are provided, and that in
the event of an extension of the legislative session, the delay in the
04-03-2025 14:39:57 MAH015

As Engrossed: S4/3/25 SB25
effective date of this Act beyond July 1, 2025 could work irreparable harm
upon the proper administration and provision of essential governmental
programs. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act
being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health
and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after July 1, 2025.

/s/Joint Budget Committee





























04-03-2025 14:39:57 MAH015